Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0328.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 2111g. (1) For a new automobile insurance policy issued after the effective date of this section, or for the first renewal of an automobile insurance policy in effect on the effective date of this section, the insurer that issues or renews the policy shall reduce the total premium charged for the policy, as calculated from rates filed and approved as provided in this chapter, by 10%. (2) An insurer shall not reduce any coverage requested by the insured under a policy that is issued or renewed as described in subsection (1) because of the reduction in premium required under subsection (1).